Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1344.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2172(a) and (c) of Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:SECTION 1. THE DEFINITION OF "POLICE ANIMAL" IN SECTION 5531 OF TITLE 18 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES IS AMENDED TO READ:§ 5531. DEFINITIONS.THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES WHEN USED IN THIS SUBCHAPTER SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:* * *"POLICE ANIMAL." AN ANIMAL, INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718 DOGS AND HORSES, USED BY THE PENNSYLVANIA STATE POLICE, A POLICE DEPARTMENT CREATED BY A METROPOLITAN TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY OPERATING UNDER 74 PA.C.S. CH. 17 (RELATING TO METROPOLITAN TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITIES), A POLICE DEPARTMENT CREATED UNDER THE ACT OF APRIL 6, 1956 (1955 P.L.1414, NO.465), KNOWN AS THE SECOND CLASS COUNTY PORT AUTHORITY ACT, THE CAPITOL POLICE, THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS, THE OFFICE OF ATTORNEY GENERAL, A COUNTY FACILITY OR OFFICE OR BY A MUNICIPAL POLICE DEPARTMENT, FIRE DEPARTMENT, SEARCH AND RESCUE UNIT OR AGENCY OR HANDLER UNDER THE SUPERVISION OF THE DEPARTMENT, SEARCH AND RESCUE UNIT OR AGENCY IN THE PERFORMANCE OF THE FUNCTIONS OR DUTIES OF THE DEPARTMENT, SEARCH AND RESCUE UNIT OR AGENCY, WHETHER THE ANIMAL IS ON DUTY OR NOT ON DUTY. THE TERM SHALL INCLUDE, BUT NOT BE LIMITED TO, AN ACCELERANT DETECTION DOG, BOMB DETECTION DOG, NARCOTIC DETECTION DOG, SEARCH AND RESCUE DOG AND TRACKING ANIMAL.* * *SECTION 2. SECTION 2172(A) AND (C) OF TITLE 53 ARE AMENDED TO READ:§ 2172. Canine training standards for police officers.(a) Establishment.--The commission, in collaboration with the Pennsylvania State Police and municipal police department canine units or officers, shall establish police officer canine training and certification standards, including all of the following:(1) Standards for initial certifications.(2) Standards for maintenance certifications.(3) Record-keeping policies and procedures for police department canine units or officers.(4) Standards for safety protocols for canine units that 20250HB1344PN3058 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 may be exposed to fentanyl. In developing the standards under this paragraph, the following shall be consulted:(i) Experts that train canines to imprint on controlled substances.(ii) Law enforcement that use canines to detect controlled substances.(iii) Experts on the training of canines for use by law enforcement.(iv) Licensed medical professionals and veterinarians with experience in: (A) Standard protocols to minimize exposure of canines and canine handlers to opioids and opioid derivatives, including fentanyl and fentanyl derivatives.(B) Detecting clinical signs of fentanyl exposure.(C) Intervening with timely and appropriate medical and veterinary medical treatment in the field, during stabilization and transport, and in-hospital following exposure to opioids and opioid derivatives, including fentanyl and fentanyl derivatives. * * *(c) Notice.--The commission shall transmit notice of the standards established and updated under this section to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.Section 2 3. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250HB1344PN3058 - 3 - <--12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728